Tennessee statutes. Title 43 Agriculture And Horticulture
Chapter 3

State Veterinarian [Transferred]

43-3-101 — 43-3-105. [Transferred.]

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 3, §§ 43-3-101 — 43-3-105, concerning the state veterinarian, was transferred to ch. 1, part 3 of this title in 1987.

The subsequent sections (ch. 1, part 3 of this title) were repealed by Acts 1988, ch. 878, § 19.